Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 5. Revivor and New Parties

Cross references. —

For provision that dormant judgment ceases to operate as a lien on the estate of the judgment debtor, see §

1-17-307

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

47 Am. Jur. 2d Judgments §§ 415 to 476.

49 C.J.S. Judgments §§ 531 to 549.

§ 1-16-501.
Proceeding against parties not summoned and persons whose liability
unknown.

When judgment is rendered
in this state on a joint instrument, parties to the action who were
not summoned and persons whose liability was not known to the plaintiff
at the rendition of the judgment may be made parties thereto by action
in the same court if they can be summoned. When the judgment is rendered
elsewhere, the plaintiff may bring suit upon the instrument against
the parties not summoned or persons whose liability was unknown, in
any county where any of the parties reside or may be summoned.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 373; R.S. 1887, § 2713; R.S. 1899, § 3807; C.S. 1910, § 4662; C.S. 1920, § 5935; R.S. 1931, § 89-2801; C.S. 1945, § 3-3901; W.S. 1957, § 1-335; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-17-501

.

Doctrine of merger abolished. —

The doctrine of merger, to the effect that whenever two or more persons are jointly liable and an action is commenced against any less than the whole number the nonjoinder of the others will sustain a plea in abatement (now motion), has been abolished in this state by this section. L.C. Jones Trucking Co. v. Superior Oil Co., 68 Wyo. 384, 234 P.2d 802,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(1951).

§ 1-16-502.
Revivor of dormant judgments; generally.

When a judgment, including judgments rendered by a circuit court, a transcript of which has been filed in the district court for execution, becomes dormant, it may be revived by the allowance of the court of a motion for revival or by a conditional order of the court that the action be revived. If the order of revival is made by consent of the parties, the action shall be revived. If the order is not made by consent, the order shall be served on the adverse party. When either party to the dormant judgment, his agent or attorney, makes affidavit showing that the adverse party is a nonresident of the state and that the judgment remains unsatisfied in whole or in part and the amount owing thereon, service may be made by publication as in other cases. If sufficient cause is not shown to the contrary, the judgment shall stand revived for the amount which the court finds to be due and unsatisfied thereon. The lien of the judgment for the amount due shall be revived and shall operate from the time of the entry of the conditional order or the filing of the motion.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 374; R.S. 1887, § 2714; R.S. 1899, § 3808; C.S. 1910, § 4663; C.S. 1920, § 5936; R.S. 1931, § 89-2802; C.S. 1945, § 3-3902; W.S. 1957, § 1-336; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-17-502; Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 1; 2016 ch. 78, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “circuit court” for “justice of the peace.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42,§ 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, substituted “by the allowance of the court of a motion for revival or by a conditional order of the court that the action be revived. If the order of revival is made by consent of the parties, the action shall be revived. If the order is not made by consent, the order shall be served on the adverse party” for “in the same manner as prescribed for reviving actions before judgment or by action” at the end of the first sentence.

Editor's notes. —

The Revisor’s Bill, Laws 2016, ch. 78, § 3, stated: “ Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Constructive service. —

There was no defect in a judgment for revivor where service was constructive instead of personal, since there had been personal service on the judgment debtors in the original action. Hume v. Ricketts, 69 Wyo. 222, 240 P.2d 881,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1952).

Effect of foreign statute of limitations. —

Where Wyoming judgment had been revived under this section, Colorado statute of limitations against actions on foreign judgments began to run from date of revivor of judgment. Kuykendall v. Tod, 219 F. 707, 1915 U.S. App. LEXIS 1661 (8th Cir. 1915).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Part payment or promise to pay judgment as affecting time for revival, 45 ALR2d 967.

§ 1-16-503.
Revivor
of dormant judgments; limitations on time to revive.

No action shall be brought to revive a judgment after ten (10) years after it becomes dormant, unless the party entitled to bring the action was:

A minor or subject to any other legal disability at the time the judgment became dormant, in which case the action may be brought within fifteen (15) years after the disability has ceased; or

A party in a child support proceeding, in which case the action shall be brought within twenty-one (21) years.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 375; R.S. 1887, § 2715; R.S. 1899, § 3809; C.S. 1910, § 4664; C.S. 1920, § 5937; R.S. 1931, § 89-2803; C.S. 1945, § 3-3903; W.S. 1957, § 1-337; Laws 1973, ch. 213, § 2; 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-17-503; Laws 2004, ch. 26, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to limitation of actions generally, see chapter 3 of this title.

As to age of majority, see §

14-1-101

.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, added (a)(ii), making related changes; and in the introductory language in (a) substituted “ten (10) years” for “twenty-one (21) years.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Child support payments. —

Where a mother did not execute on periodic child support payments within five years of their becoming due, the judgments became dormant, subject to revival within 21 (now 10) years. Hollingshead v. Hollingshead, 942 P.2d 1104,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 98

(Wyo. 1997).

The doctrine of laches did not apply where a mother revived her claims for child support when she brought a collection action against the father within 21 (now 10) years. Hammond v. Hammond, 14 P.3d 199,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 217

(Wyo. 2000).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Absence of judgment debtor from state as suspending or tolling running of period of limitations as to judgment, 27 ALR2d 839.

Reviving, renewing or extending judgment by order entered after expiration of statutory limitation period on motion or proceeding commenced within such period, 52 ALR2d 672.

§ 1-16-504.
Revivor when parties die after judgment.

If either or both parties die after judgment and before satisfaction thereof, their representatives may be made parties to the judgment in the same manner prescribed for the revival of actions as provided in W.S.

1-16-502

. The judgment may be rendered and execution awarded against the representatives of the deceased parties.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 376; R.S. 1887, § 2716; R.S. 1899, § 3810; C.S. 1910, § 4665; C.S. 1920, § 5938; R.S. 1931, § 89-2804; C.S. 1945, § 3-3904; W.S. 1957, § 1-338; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-17-504; 2016 ch. 78, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

Cross references. —

As to abatement and survival of causes of action, see chapter 4 of this title.

As to substitution of parties when one dies before judgment, see Rule 25, W.R.C.P.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, substituted “as provided in W.S.

1-16-502

” for “before judgment” at the end of the first sentence.

Editor's notes. —

The Revisor’s Bill, Laws 2016, ch. 78, § 3, stated: “ Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Death of 1 of 2 judgment creditors who are partners. —

Since, under §§

17-21-601

and

17-21-801

, a surviving partner succeeds to the rights of the deceased partner in trust for the purpose of liquidation, no revivor of judgment is necessary in the case of the death of one of two partners who are judgment creditors. Hume v. Ricketts, 69 Wyo. 222, 240 P.2d 881,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1952).

Where judgment creditors were partners, it was not necessary to bring the action for revivor within a year after the death of one of them, but the surviving partner was able to do so within the limitation of 21 years provided by §

1-16-503

, and without joining the heirs of the deceased partner, although joinder of the heirs was harmless. Hume v. Ricketts, 69 Wyo. 222, 240 P.2d 881,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1952).

§ 1-16-505.
Partners made parties to judgment.

The members of a partnership
against which a judgment has been rendered in its firm name may by
action be made parties to the judgment.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 377; R.S. 1887, § 2717; R.S. 1899, § 3811; C.S. 1910, § 4666; C.S. 1920, § 5939; R.S. 1931, § 89-2805; C.S. 1945, § 3-3905; W.S. 1957, § 1-339; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-17-505.

In general. —

If a partnership is sued as an entity, a judgment in the action reaches the joint property of the partnership, and a plaintiff in such an action may reach the members of the partnership under the provisions of this section. L.C. Jones Trucking Co. v. Superior Oil Co., 68 Wyo. 384, 234 P.2d 802,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(1951).

Quoted

in

Wyoming Nat'l Bank v. Davis, 770 P.2d 215,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 1989).

Law reviews. —

See comment, “Effect of Judgment Against Only One Partner on Partnership Property,” 6 Wyo. L.J. 217.

§ 1-16-506.
Sureties made parties to judgment.

Sureties to the bond
of an executor, administrator, guardian or trustee may by action be
made parties to a judgment thereon against the principal.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 378; R.S. 1887, § 2715; R.S. 1899, § 3812; C.S. 1910, § 4667; C.S. 1920, § 5940; R.S. 1931, § 89-2806; C.S. 1945, § 3-3906; W.S. 1957, § 1-340; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-17-506.

Cross references. —

As to judgment against surety for costs, see §

1-14-123

.

For provision that surety of officer may be made party to judgment in case of amercement, see §

1-24-106

.

As to judgment against plaintiff and his sureties in action of replevin, see §

1-15-105

.

As to rights of surety on paying judgment, see §

38-1-104

.

As to judgment against surety in connection with appeals to supreme court, see Rule 4.05, W.R.A.P.

When liability of administrator becomes fixed, that of surety also attaches,

and upon failure of principal to pay money, action can be maintained against surety. In such case, decree of probate court is conclusive upon status of account as respects sureties as well as administrator. Wayman v. Alanko, 351 P.2d 100,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 1960).

And surety cannot relitigate matter without such proof as would
justify opening any other judgment. —

If the district court sitting in probate had jurisdiction to enter the judgments against defendant guardian, then the rule of res judicata applies in the supreme court with full force and the surety cannot relitigate it without proof of fraud or gross mistake such as would justify opening any other judgment. Wayman v. Alanko, 351 P.2d 100,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 1960).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Conclusiveness and effect upon guarantor of default or consent judgment against principal, 59 ALR2d 752.